District of Columbia statutes.
4-205.70

Denial of assistance for fugitive felons and probation and parole violators.

(a)

A person shall be ineligible for TANF benefits if that person:

(1)

Flees to avoid prosecution, custody, or confinement after conviction, under the laws of the jurisdiction from which the person flees, for a crime, or an attempt to commit a crime, which is a felony under the laws of the jurisdiction from which the individual flees, or which, in the case of the State of New Jersey, is a high misdemeanor under New Jersey law; or

(2)

Violates a condition of probation or parole imposed under federal, District of Columbia, or state law.

(b)

Subsection (a) of this section shall not apply with respect to conduct of an individual for any month beginning after the President of the United States grants a pardon with respect to the conduct.

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 570
as added Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-241, § 4(g), 46 DCR 905
1981 Ed., § 3-205.70.
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 4(e) of Public Assistance Temporary Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Law 12-7, August 1, 1997, law notification 44 DCR 4639).
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 4(e) of Public Assistance Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-130, July 24, 1998, law notification 45 DCR 6501).
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 4(h) of Self-Sufficiency Promotion Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-230, April 20, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 4143).
See notes to § 4-205.69.